Maryland, session 2025, HB1161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 5 – Calvert County
5–202.
The County Commissioners may appropriate a sum in an amount to be determined
by them to the [Calvert Memorial Hospital] CALVERTHEALTH MEDICAL CENTER, INC.,
AND ITS SUCCESSORS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1161*